Hawaii statutes.
§445-5 Fees; date when due and payable.
All fees for licenses prescribed by any law of the State, except as otherwise
specifically provided, shall be due and payable at times to be established by
the county within which the license is to be operative. [L 1905, c 32, §1; RL
1925, §1960; RL 1935, §2405; RL 1945, §7006; RL 1955, §155-6; HRS §445-5; am L
1990, c 164, §5]

Case Notes

Cited: 36 H. 369, 379 (1943).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next